Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.140

County jail prisoners may be compelled to work.

When a person has been sentenced by a district judge or a judge of the superior court to a term of imprisonment in the county jail, whether in default of payment of a fine, or costs or otherwise; such person may be compelled to work eight hours, each day of such term, in and about the county buildings, public roads, streets and grounds: PROVIDED, This section and RCW 9.92.130 shall not apply to persons committed in default of bail.

[ 1987 c 202 s 145; Code 1881 s 2076; 1867 p 56 s 24; 1858 p 10 s 1; RRS s 10190.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Employment of prisoners: RCW 36.28.100.

Working out fine: Chapter 10.82 RCW.